Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0921.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3009a. An individual who sustains bodily injury or death arising from the ownership or use of a motor vehicle is not entitled to recover any amount under a policy as described in section 3009 if all of the following apply: (a) The individual was the passenger in the motor vehicle at the time of the accident from which the injury or death arises. (b) The driver of the motor vehicle had an impaired ability to function due to the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance, as described in section 2955a of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2955a, and the accident was a result of that impaired ability. (c) Either of the following applies to the individual who was the passenger: (i) The individual also had an impaired ability to function due to the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance, as described in section 2955a of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2955a. (ii) The individual refused to consent when requested by a peace officer to submit to collection and testing of breath, blood, or urine specimens in the same manner that breath, blood, and urine specimens are collected and tested for alcohol- and controlled-substance-related driving violations under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923. (d) One or more individuals other than the passenger sustained bodily injury or death as a result of the accident, and the higher limit under section 3009(1)(b) is applicable. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act applies to an automobile insurance policy issued or renewed after the effective date of this amendatory act.